apertium-uig.uig.lexc
LEXICON CASE
!%<nom%>: Copula ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-COP ;

!%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} Copula ;
!%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLITICS ;

%<dat-f%>:%>%{Gf%}%{Af%} CLITICS ;
%<dat-f%>:%>%{G%}%{Af%} CLITICS ;
%<dat-b%>:%>%{Gb%}%{Ab%} CLITICS ;
%<dat-f%>:%>%{Gf%}%{A%} CLITICS ;
%<dat-b%>:%>%{Gb%}%{A%} CLITICS ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLITICS ;

%<loc-f%>:%>%{D%}%{Af%} CLITICS-COP ;
%<loc-b%>:%>%{D%}%{Ab%} CLITICS-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-COP ;
!%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} Copula ;

%<loc-f%>%<attr%>:%>%{D%}%{Af%}%>كى CLITICS ;
%<loc-b%>%<attr%>:%>%{D%}%{Ab%}%>كى CLITICS ;
%<loc%>%<attr%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%>كى CLITICS ;

%<loc-f%>%<subst%>:%>%{D%}%{Af%}%>كى SUBST-2 ;
%<loc-b%>%<subst%>:%>%{D%}%{Ab%}%>كى SUBST-2 ;
%<loc%>%<subst%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%>كى SUBST-2 ;

%<loc-f%>%<subst%>%<pl-f%>:%>%{D%}%{Af%}%>كى%>ل%{Af%}ر SUBST-2 ;
%<loc-b%>%<subst%>%<pl-b%>:%>%{D%}%{Ab%}%>كى%>ل%{Ab%}ر SUBST-2 ;
%<loc%>%<subst%>%<pl-f%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%>كى%>ل%{Af%}ر SUBST-2 ;
%<loc%>%<subst%>%<pl-b%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%>كى%>ل%{Ab%}ر SUBST-2 ;
%<loc%>%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%>كى%>ل%{A%}ر SUBST-2 ;

%<abl%>:%>%{D%}ىن CLITICS-COP ;
!%<gen%>:%>نىڭ Copula ;
%<gen%>:%>نىڭ CLITICS ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>نىڭكى SUBST-2 ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>%<pl-f%>:%>نىڭكى%>ل%{Af%}ر SUBST-2 ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>%<pl-b%>:%>نىڭكى%>ل%{Ab%}ر SUBST-2 ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>نىڭكى%>ل%{A%}ر SUBST-2 ;
!%<acc%>:%>نى # ;
%<acc%>:%>نى CLITICS ;
%<ter%>:%>%{G%}ىچە CLITICS ;
%<ter-f%>:%>%{Gf%}ىچە CLITICS ;
%<ter-b%>:%>%{Gb%}ىچە CLITICS ;

LEXICON CASE-2

%<nom%>: CLITICS ;
!%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLITICS ;
%<dat-f%>:%>%{Gf%}%{Af%} CLITICS ;
%<dat-b%>:%>%{Gb%}%{Ab%} CLITICS ;
%<dat-f%>:%>%{Gf%}%{A%} CLITICS ;
%<dat-b%>:%>%{Gb%}%{A%} CLITICS ;

%<loc-b%>:%>%{D%}%{Ab%} CLITICS ;
%<loc-f%>:%>%{D%}%{Af%} CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS ;
%<loc-b%>%<attr%>:%>%{D%}%{Ab%}%>كى CLITICS ;
%<loc-f%>%<attr%>:%>%{D%}%{Af%}%>كى CLITICS ;
%<loc%>%<attr%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%>كى CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}ىن CLITICS ;
%<gen%>:%>نىڭ CLITICS ;
%<acc%>:%>نى CLITICS ;
%<ter%>:%>%{G%}ىچە CLITICS ;
%<ter-f%>:%>%{Gf%}ىچە CLITICS ;
%<ter-b%>:%>%{Gb%}ىچە CLITICS ;


LEXICON POSSESSION
CASE ;
%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}م CASE ; ! Dir/LR
%<px1sg%>:%>%{U%}م CASE ; 
%<px1sg-f%>:%>%{Uf%}م CASE ; 
%<px1sg-b%>:%>%{Ub%}م CASE ; 
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}ڭ CASE ; ! Dir/LR
%<px2sg%>:%>%{U%}ڭ CASE ; 
%<px2sg-f%>:%>%{Uf%}ڭ CASE ;
%<px2sg-b%>:%>%{Ub%}ڭ CASE ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}ڭلار CASE ; ! Dir/LR
%<px2pl%>:%>%{U%}ڭلار CASE ; 
%<px2pl-f%>:%>%{Uf%}ڭلار CASE ;
%<px2pl-b%>:%>%{Ub%}ڭلار CASE ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}ى CASE ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}م%{I%}ز CASE ; ! Dir/LR
%<px1pl%>:%>%{U%}م%{I%}ز CASE ; 
%<px1pl-f%>:%>%{Uf%}م%{I%}ز CASE ; 
%<px1pl-b%>:%>%{Ub%}م%{I%}ز CASE ; 
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{i%}ڭ%{I%}ز CASE ; ! Dir/LR
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{U%}ڭ%{I%}ز CASE ; 
%<px2pl-f%>%<frm%>:%>%{Uf%}ڭ%{I%}ز CASE ; 
%<px2pl-b%>%<frm%>:%>%{Ub%}ڭ%{I%}ز CASE ; 
!%<px3sg%>%<frm%>:%>‫لىرى‬ CASE ;
%<px3pl%>:%>لىرى CASE ;

LEXICON SUBST-2
CASE-2 ;
%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}م CASE-2 ; ! Dir/LR
%<px1sg%>:%>%{U%}م CASE-2 ;
%<px1sg-f%>:%>%{Uf%}م CASE-2 ;
%<px1sg-b%>:%>%{Ub%}م CASE-2 ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}ڭ CASE-2 ; ! Dir/LR
%<px2sg%>:%>%{U%}ڭ CASE-2 ;
%<px2sg-f%>:%>%{Uf%}ڭ CASE-2 ;
%<px2sg-b%>:%>%{Ub%}ڭ CASE-2 ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}ڭلار CASE-2 ; ! Dir/LR
%<px2pl%>:%>%{U%}ڭلار CASE-2 ;
%<px2pl-f%>:%>%{Uf%}ڭلار CASE-2 ;
%<px2pl-b%>:%>%{Ub%}ڭلار CASE-2 ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}ى CASE-2 ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}م%{I%}ز CASE-2 ; ! Dir/LR
%<px1pl%>:%>%{U%}م%{I%}ز CASE-2 ;
%<px1pl-f%>:%>%{Uf%}م%{I%}ز CASE-2 ;
%<px1pl-b%>:%>%{Ub%}م%{I%}ز CASE-2 ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{i%}ڭ%{I%}ز CASE-2 ; ! Dir/LR
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{U%}ڭ%{I%}ز CASE-2 ;
%<px2pl-f%>%<frm%>:%>%{Uf%}ڭ%{I%}ز CASE-2 ;
%<px2pl-b%>%<frm%>:%>%{Ub%}ڭ%{I%}ز CASE-2 ;
!%<px3sg%>%<frm%>:%>‫لىرى‬ CASE-2 ;
%<px3pl%>:%>لىرى CASE ;


LEXICON NP-COMMON

POSSESSION ;

LEXICON N-COMMON

NP-COMMON ;
%<pl-f%>:%>ل%{Af%}ر NP-COMMON ;
%<pl-b%>:%>ل%{Ab%}ر NP-COMMON ;
%<pl%>:%>ل%{A%}ر NP-COMMON ;
POST-SUFFIX ; 

LEXICON N1

%<n%>: N-COMMON ;
!%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-AL 

%<np%>%<al%>: NP-COMMON ;


LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: NP-COMMON ;


LEXICON NUM 

%<num%>: # ; 
%<num%>%<subst%>: NP-COMMON ; ! FIXME: real subst lex
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{U%}نچ%{I%} # ; ! 
%<num%>%<ord-f%>:%>%{Uf%}نچ%{I%} # ; ! 
%<num%>%<ord-b%>:%>%{Ub%}نچ%{I%} # ; ! 
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{i%}نچ%{I%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>%{i%}نچ%{I%} NP-COMMON ; ! FIXME: real subst lex

LEXICON PRON-DEM-CASE-PL

%<nom%>: CLITICS ;
%<acc%>:نى CLITICS ;
%<gen%>:نىڭ CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:دا CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:دىن CLITICS ;
%<dat%>:غا CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-CASE

%<nom%>: CLITICS ;
%<acc%>:نى CLITICS ;
%<gen%>:نىڭ CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:ندا CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:نىڭدا CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:ندىن CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:نىڭدىن CLITICS ;
%<dat%>:ڭا CLITICS ;
%<dat%>:نىڭغا CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-AN

%<nom%>:ەن CLITICS ;
%<dat%>:اڭا CLITICS ;
%<acc%>:ىنى CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<gen%>:ىنىڭ CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<abl%>:ەندىن CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:ەندە CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:ېنىڭدىن CLITICS ;


LEXICON PRON-PERS-MAN

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>: PRON-PERS-AN ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ېنى CLITICS ; ! FIXME: Check
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ىنا CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ېنىڭ CLITICS ;



LEXICON PRON-PERS-SAN

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: PRON-PERS-AN ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ېنى CLITICS ; ! FIXME: Check
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ېنىڭ CLITICS ; ! FIXME: Check

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SIZ

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>: CASE-2 ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SILI

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>: CASE-2 ; 

LEXICON PRON-PERS-U
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLITICS ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:نى CLITICS ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:نىڭ CLITICS ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc-b%>:نىڭدا CLITICS ; ! 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:دىن CLITICS ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:نىڭغا CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-U2

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:نىڭ CLITICS ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ندا CLITICS ; ! 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ندىن CLITICS ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ڭا CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-U3

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:نىڭ CLITICS ;  
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:دا CLITICS ; ! 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:دىن CLITICS ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:غا CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-BIZ

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>: CASE-2 ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>لەر CASE-2 ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SANLAR

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>: CASE-2 ; 

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SILAR 

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>: CASE-2 ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SIZLAR 

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>: CASE-2 ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-ULAR

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>: CASE-2 ; 

LEXICON PRON-REFL-INFL
%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}م%{e%} CASE-2 ;
%<px1sg%>:%>ۈم%{e%} CASE-2 ; ! Dir/LR
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}ڭ%{e%} CASE-2 ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}ڭلار CASE-2 ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}ى%{e%} CASE-2 ;
%<px1pl%>:ىمىز%{e%} CASE-2 ;
%<px2pl%>:ىڭىز%{e%} CASE-2 ;
%<px1pl%>:لىرىمىز%{e%} CASE-2 ;
%<px2pl%>:لىرىڭىز%{e%} CASE-2 ;
%<px3pl%>:لىرى CASE-2 ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL

%<prn%>%<ref%>: PRON-REFL-INFL ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>: # ;


LEXICON PRON-DEM-COMMON

%<pl-f%>:ل%{Af%}ر PRON-DEM-CASE-PL ;
%<pl-b%>:ل%{Ab%}ر PRON-DEM-CASE-PL ;
%<pl%>:ل%{A%}ر PRON-DEM-CASE-PL ;
PRON-DEM-CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BU

%<prn%>%<dem%>: PRON-DEM-COMMON ; ! FIXME: subst lex


LEXICON PRON-DEM-SHU

%<prn%>%<dem%>: PRON-DEM-COMMON ; ! FIXME: subst lex


LEXICON PRON-DEM-U

%<prn%>%<dem%>: PRON-DEM-COMMON ; ! FIXME: subst lex

LEXICON PRON-MISC

%<prn%>: CASE-2 ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS

%<prn%>%<pers%>: CASE-2 ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASE-2 ;

LEXICON PRON-ADV

%<prn%>%<adv%>: CASE-2 ;


LEXICON PRON-ITG

%<prn%>%<itg%>: N-COMMON ;

LEXICON DET-MISC

%<det%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: SUBST-2 ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON Nouns 
مۈڭگۈز:مۈڭگۈز N1 ; ! ""
LEXICON Verbs 
ئى%<v%>%<iv%>%<ger_past%>:ئىكەنلىگ SUBST-2 ; !
ئى%<v%>%<iv%>%<ger_past%>:ئىكەنلىك SUBST-2 ; !
LEXICON Check 
مىليون:مىليون NUM ; ! "million"
ئۈچ:ئۈچ NUM ; ! "three"
توققۇز:توققۇز NUM ; ! "nine"
بەش:بەش NUM ; ! "five"
يەتتە:يەتتە NUM ; ! "seven"
سەككىز:سەككىز NUM ; ! "eight"
توقسان:توقسان NUM ; ! "ninety"
يەتمىش:يەتمىش NUM ; ! "seventy"
ئوتتۇز:ئوتتۇز NUM ; ! "thirty"
ئاتمىش:ئاتمىش NUM ; ! "sixty"
باكتېرىيە:باكتېرىيە%{☫%} N1 ; ! "bacterium"
پالانچى:پالانچى PRON-MISC ; ! "someone"
ھېچنېمە:ھېچنېمە PRON-NEG ; ! "anything"
ھېچنېمە:ھېچنېمى PRON-NEG ; ! "anything"
نېمىكى:نېمىكى PRON-MISC ; ! "whatever"
كىمنىڭ:كىمنىڭ PRON-MISC ; ! "whose"
ئەڭ:ئەڭ PRON-MISC ; ! "most"
ھېچ:ھېچ PRON-MISC ; ! "any"
ھېچقايسى:ھېچقايسى PRON-QNT ; ! "any"
بىرەر% نەرسە:بىرەر% نەرسە PRON-QNT ; ! "birşey" Use/MT
شىمال:شىمال%{☫%} N1 ; ! "north"
ياۋ:ياۋ N1 ; ! ""
مايلامچى:مايلامچى N1 ; ! ""
جىنچىراغ:جىنچىراغ N1 ; ! ""
سىماب:سىماب N1 ; ! ""
يانار:يانار N1 ; ! ""
ماراقچى:ماراقچى N1 ; ! ""
ھەرقانداق:ھەرقانداق DET-MISC ; ! ""
تۈرلۈك:تۈرلۈك DET-MISC ; ! ""
بىر% نەچچە:بىر% نەچچە DET-QNT ; ! ""
قانچە:قانچە DET-MISC ; ! ""
قانچە:قانچە DET-QNT ; ! ""
ھېچقانداق:ھېچقانداق DET-MISC ; ! ""
ئەنە:ئەنە PRON-MISC ; ! ""
ئەتراپىدا:ئەتراپىدا DET-MISC ; ! ""
ھەربىر:ھەربىر DET-QNT ; ! ""
ھەربىر:ھەربىر PRON-QNT ; ! ""
نە:نە PRON-ITG ; ! "" Dir/LR
چولپان:چولپان NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
مەريەم:مەريەم NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
مۇھەررەم:مۇھەررەم NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
بىجاق:بىجاق NP-TOP ; ! ""
ھەممەيلەن:ھەممەيلەن PRON-QNT ; ! ""
كۆپلەپ:كۆپلەپ DET-MISC ; ! ""
بارچە:بارچە DET-MISC ; ! ""
كۆپلىگەن:كۆپلىگەن DET-MISC ; ! ""
جەمئىي:جەمئىي DET-MISC ; ! ""
ئەنگلىيە:ئەنگلىيە%{☫%} NP-TOP ; ! ""
قەيەر:قەيەر PRON-ITG ; !
قاياق:قاياق PRON-ITG ; !
قانداق:قانداق PRON-ITG ; !
نەچچە:نەچچە PRON-ITG ; !
قانچە:قانچە PRON-ITG ; !
قايسى:قايسى PRON-ITG ; !
تاي% كەچكەن:تاي% كەچكەن NP-TOP ; !
قايسى:قايسى PRON-ITG ; !
ئەكرەم:ئەكرەم NP-ANT-M ; !
بىر:بىر%{e%} PRON-MISC ; !
ئالمۇتا:ئالمۇتا%{☫%} NP-TOP ; !
ستالىن:ستالىن NP-COG-MF ; !
سېيىت:سېيىت NP-ANT-M ; !
مەۋلۈدە:مەۋلۈدە NP-ANT-F ; !
مۇتەللىپ:مۇتەللىپ NP-COG-MF ; !
ئايگۈل:ئايگۈل NP-ANT-M ; !
ي% پ% گ:ي% پ% گ NP-ORG ; !
ئاتاتۈرك:ئاتاتۈرك NP-COG-MF ; !
قىزىلئاي:قىزىلئاي NP-ORG ; !
ئىسرائىلىيە:ئىسرائىلىيە%{☫%} NP-TOP ; !
مۇستافا:مۇستافا NP-ANT-M ; !
تىللېرسون:تىللېرسون NP-COG-MF ; !
سوچى:سوچى NP-TOP ; !
بىرسى:بىرسى%{e%} PRON-QNT ; !
نىمە:نىمە PRON-ITG ; !
ك% گ% ب:ك% گ% ب NP-ORG ; !
ن% ك% ۋ% د:ن% ك% ۋ% د NP-ORG ; !
س% س% س% ر:س% س% س% ر NP-ORG ; !
تۈمتۈرك:تۈمتۈرك NP-COG-MF ; !
ئا% ر:ئا% ر NP-ORG ; !
ھېچنەرسە:ھېچنەرسە PRON-NEG ; !
ئۇياق:ئۇياق PRON-ADV ; !
شەن:شەن NP-COG-MF ; !
ئىككىيلەن:ئىككىيلەن PRON-MISC ; !
ۋىۋىسكىن:ۋىۋىسكىن NP-ANT-M ; !
ئاھۇ:ئاھۇ NP-ANT-F ; !
بىربىرى:بىربىرى%{e%} PRON-MISC ; !
ھېچنىمە:ھېچنىمە PRON-NEG ; !
ھېچقانچە:ھېچقانچە PRON-QNT ; !
ھەرقايسى:ھەرقايسى DET-QNT ; !
ھەممى:ھەممى PRON-QNT ; !
بىرمۇنچە:بىرمۇنچە DET-QNT ; !
ھىچبىر:ھىچبىر DET-QNT ; !
ھېچبىر:ھېچبىر DET-QNT ; !
ھېچبىر:ھېچبىر PRON-QNT ; !
بىرئاز:بىرئاز DET-QNT ; !
بەزى:بەزى DET-QNT ; !
ئەزھەر:ئەزھەر NP-COG-MF ; !
نەگە:نەگە PRON-ITG ; !
مۇھاكەمەتۇل% لۇغەتەين:مۇھاكەمەتۇل% لۇغەتەين NP-AL ; !
گوگۇل:گوگۇل NP-ORG ; !
خۇزەيمە:خۇزەيمە NP-COG-MF ; !
سەلەمە:سەلەمە NP-ANT-F ; !
بۇيەر:بۇيەر PRON-ADV ; !
مىشكات% مەسابىھ:مىشكات% مەسابىھ NP-AL ; !
ماۋرا% ئۈنەھرى:ماۋرا% ئۈنەھرى NP-TOP ; !
بىرەرسى:بىرەرسى PRON-QNT ; !
مۇھاكىمەتۇل% لۇغەتەين:مۇھاكىمەتۇل% لۇغەتەين NP-AL ; !
ئەفاھ:ئەفاھ NP-ANT-M ; !
قەھەت:قەھەت N1 ; !
يەھورام:يەھورام%{☫%} NP-ANT-M ; !
ئابدۇرېشىت:ئابدۇرېشىت NP-ANT-F ; !
كامېرون:كامېرون NP-COG-MF ; !
ئوبۇلقاسىم:ئوبۇلقاسىم NP-ANT-M ; !
لوندون:لوندون NP-TOP ; !
جۇن:جۇن NP-ANT-F ; !
ت% ب% م% م:ت% ب% م% م NP-ORG ; !
سان:سان NP-AL ; !
باغداد:باغداد NP-TOP ; !
كۇلۇپ:كۇلۇپ NP-AL ; !
ۋ% ۋ% ۋ:ۋ% ۋ% ۋ NP-AL ; !
ئا:ئا PRON-PERS ; !
لىنۇكس:لىنۇكس NP-AL ; !
تايم:تايم NP-ORG ; !
فرەدرىخ:فرەدرىخ NP-ANT-M ; !
براۋن:براۋن NP-COG-MF ; !
ئاننا:ئاننا NP-ANT-F ; !
ئى% ئو% س:ئى% ئو% س NP-AL ; !
غەربىي% جەنۇب:غەربىي% جەنۇب NP-TOP ; !
مىئا:مىئا NP-ANT-F ; !
ۋاكفىكەبىر:ۋاكفىكەبىر NP-ORG ; !
ست:ست NP-AL ; !
دەدپۇل:دەدپۇل NP-AL ; !
ئىۋان:ئىۋان NP-ANT-M ; !
